District of Columbia statutes.
29A-101.09

Repealed

Reserved name.

Repealed.

June 8, 1954, 68 Stat. 183, ch. 269, § 9
Sept. 2, 1957, 71 Stat. 569, Pub. L. 85-254, § 2
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-255, § 28(d), 44 DCR 1271
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(j), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-101.09.
1981 Ed., § 29-309.
1973 Ed., § 29-906a.